Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-246
Reciprocal requirements and disabilities; applicable; when.

When the laws or the rules of the authorities of a state or country place any requirement or disability upon any person holding a diploma or certificate from any school or college of barbering in this state in which barbering is taught, which affects the right of such person to be licensed in such state, the same requirement or disability shall be placed upon any person holding a diploma or certificate from a similar school or college situated in that state when applying for a license to practice in this state.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 9.